Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2682.
hereby enacts as follows:CHAPTER 1PRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSection 101. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Pennsylvania Water Resource Act.Section 102. Scope of act.This act applies to extraordinary nonmunicipal water withdrawals by for-profit businesses.Section 103. Legislative findings and declarations.The General Assembly finds and declares that:(1) Section 27 of Article I of the Constitution of Pennsylvania guarantees every Pennsylvanian the right to pure water and designates the Commonwealth as trustee of public 20260HB2682PN3737 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 natural resources for the benefit of all people, including generations yet to come.(2) The Pennsylvania Supreme Court has held that this obligation is self-executing, binds all branches of government and requires that economic development not occur at the cost of unreasonable degradation of the environment.(3) Extraordinary commercial water users who consume Pennsylvania's public water resources without contributing to their protection impose costs on the Commonwealth's ability to fulfill its constitutional trustee obligations.(4) This act implements the Commonwealth's constitutional duties by ensuring that those who derive economic benefit from Pennsylvania's public water resources contribute to their protection and restoration.(5) Withdrawals from the waterways of this Commonwealth for agricultural purposes would be more appropriately considered by the General Assembly in the next review of the State Water Plan developed under 27 Pa.C.S. § 3115 (relating to development, adoption, amendment and periodic review of State water plan) and are therefore not covered under the provisions of this act.Section 104. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commission." The Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission."Consume." Remove water from the waters of this Commonwealth and not return the water to the natural source."Consumer Price Index." The Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and 20260HB2682PN3737 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Maryland area for the most recent 12-month period for which figures have been officially reported by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics."Critical area resource plan." The term shall mean the same as defined under 27 Pa.C.S. § 3102 (relating to definitions)."Critical water planning area." The term shall mean the same as defined under 27 Pa.C.S. § 3102."Customer assistance program." Any of the following:(1) A plan or program sponsored by a public utility for the purpose of providing universal service and energy conservation, as defined under 66 Pa.C.S. §§ 2202 (relating to definitions) and 2803 (relating to definitions).(2) An assistance program offered by a public utility, including a water distribution utility or wastewater utility, in which customers make monthly payments based on household income and household size and under which customers must comply with responsibilities and restrictions to remain eligible for the assistance program."Data center." A facility, campus of facilities or interconnected array of facilities that may be composed of one or more businesses, owners or tenants, that meet all of the following:(1) Are predominantly used to house working servers or similar data storage systems.(2) Have uninterruptible energy supply or generator backup power, cooling systems, towers and other temperature control infrastructure.(3) Have a peak electric demand of 10 megawatts or greater."Department." The Department of Environmental Protection of 20260HB2682PN3737 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the Commonwealth."Electric distribution company." The term shall mean the same as defined under 66 Pa.C.S. § 2803."Electric utility." A corporation, person, agency, authority or other legal entity or instrumentality aligned with distribution facilities for delivery of electric energy for use primarily by the public."Electric utility generator." A generator:(1) that is owned by an electric utility or a jointly owned generator with the greatest share of the generator being electric utility owned; or(2) with two or more owners that have equal shares of ownership in the generator if one of the owners is an electric utility."Energy consumption." The total amount of electricity or other forms of energy consumed by a data center, measured in kilowatt-hours."Extraordinary water user." A person that withdraws more than 10,000 gallons of water per day from the waters of this Commonwealth for the purpose of for-profit business. The term does not include a community water system or a noncommunity water system regulated by the department under the act of May 1, 1984 (P.L.206, No.43), known as the Pennsylvania Safe Drinking Water Act, that withdraws water from the waters of this Commonwealth."Facility." One or more parcels of land located in this Commonwealth and any structures and personal property contained on the land."Fund." The Water Use Fund established in section 303(a)."Groundwater or surface water source." A river, stream, 20260HB2682PN3737 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 brook, lake, body of water or aquifer located in this Commonwealth."PENNVEST." The Pennsylvania Infrastructure Investment Authority established under the act of March 1, 1988 (P.L.82, No.16), known as the Pennsylvania Infrastructure Investment Authority Act."Returned water." Water that has been placed back into the waters of this Commonwealth, whether the water is diminished in quality or not."Tier 2 extraordinary water user." An extraordinary water user that withdraws more than 1,000,000 gallons of water per day from the waters of this Commonwealth for the purpose of for-profit business."Watershed." The Susquehanna, Ohio, Delaware, Potomac, Erie, Genesee, Elk and Gunpowder watersheds."Water usage effectiveness." The ratio of water used by a facility to the energy consumption of the equipment utilized by that facility."Withdraw" or "withdrawal." The removal, diversion or taking of water from a groundwater or surface water source.CHAPTER 2DATA CENTER WATER CONSUMPTION REPORTING REQUIREMENTSSection 201. Reporting requirements.(a) Annual report.--Each data center operating in this Commonwealth shall submit an annual report to the department on the facility's energy consumption and water consumption for the preceding calendar year.(b) Contents.--The report shall include the following:(1) The name and address of the facility, including the nature or purpose of the facility.20260HB2682PN3737 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Total energy consumption for the previous calendar year, specified by month and the energy source consumed.(3) The estimated average amount of energy usage per hour during the data center's peak load, measured in kilowatt-hours.(4) Total water consumption for the previous calendar year, with the maximum day demand, specified by month, water source and whether the consumption was intended for cooling or another application.(5) Any measures undertaken in the previous calendar year to improve energy or water efficiency and reduce energy or water consumption.(6) Any measures undertaken to protect the environment and public from polluted water.(7) Any measures undertaken to generate electricity on-site or off-site to reduce carbon emissions or impacts on the electric grid, including the specific energy source, and any potential future measures to generate electricity or other form of energy on-site or off-site.(8) Any measures undertaken to recover waste heat to power the data center or to recover waste heat for purposes relating to general building heating, cooling systems or coolant systems specifically for the capture of waste heat from processors.(9) An estimation of the projected total energy and water demand for the following year, including a comparison of the previous year's total energy and water consumption, if applicable.(10) Any other information required by the department.(c) Submission.--By July 1, 2027, and each July 1 20260HB2682PN3737 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 thereafter, the annual report shall be submitted in a manner determined by the department.(d) Department duties.--The department, in consultation with the commission, shall publish an annual report on the energy and water consumption trends for data centers operating in this Commonwealth, including environmental impacts and recommendations to address identified issues. The report shall be made available on the department's publicly accessible Internet website and shall be submitted in paper form or electronically to:(1) The Governor.(2) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Environmental Resources and Energy Committee of the Senate.(3) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Energy Committee of the House of Representatives.(4) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Environmental and Natural Resource Protection Committee of the House of Representatives.(5) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Consumer Protection and Professional Licensure Committee of the Senate.(6) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Consumer Protection, Technology and Utilities Committee of the House of Representatives.(e) Data confidentiality.--(1) For annual reports submitted under subsection (a), the following apply:(i) All information included in annual reports submitted under this section shall be subject to public disclosure unless the information is proprietary 20260HB2682PN3737 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 information. A data center that is required to submit a report under this section may appeal to the department, on a form and in a manner determined by the department, that information included in annual reports that is subject to public disclosure should be deemed proprietary information.(ii) In accordance with section 27 of Article I of the Constitution of Pennsylvania establishing that water withdrawn from the waterways of this Commonwealth is a public good, data concerning the water consumption level of a facility under this act shall not be considered proprietary information.(2) All aggregated and anonymized data shall be made publicly available.(f) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Proprietary information." Information included in a facility's annual report that is determined by the department to not be subject to public disclosure."Water consumption." The total amount of water consumed by a data center, including water used for cooling, measured in gallons.Section 202. Enforcement and penalties.(a) Violations.--A data center that fails to comply with the reporting requirements under section 201 shall be subject to a civil penalty of $10,000 per day until the report is submitted to the department.(b) False reporting penalties.--A data center that knowingly submits inaccurate, false or materially misleading information 20260HB2682PN3737 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in a report required under section 201 shall be subject to a civil penalty of $25,000 per violation. Each calendar day on which false or misleading information was operative in a submitted report shall constitute a separate violation.(c) Deposit of penalties collected.--Penalties collected under this section shall be deposited into the low-income electric customer assistance program account of the electric distribution company for the service territory in which the data center in violation is located.(d) Audit authority.--The department may conduct periodic audits of annual reports submitted under section 201 to verify the accuracy of reported water and energy consumption data. The department may require a data center to provide metering records, utility invoices, third-party verification documentation or any other records necessary to conduct an audit. A data center shall retain each record necessary to verify reported data for a period of five years from the date of submission of each annual report.(e) Third-party verification.--A tier 2 extraordinary water user subject to the reporting requirements under section 201 shall obtain independent third-party verification of its reported water consumption data beginning with the second annual report required under this chapter. The third-party verifier must be approved by the department and shall certify the accuracy of reported consumption figures. The cost of third-party verification shall be borne by the data center.CHAPTER 3WATER RESOURCE PROTECTIONSection 301. Registration.(a) General rule.--An extraordinary water user may not 20260HB2682PN3737 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 withdraw water from a groundwater or surface water source for a nonmunicipal purpose without filing a registration document with the department.(b) Registration document.--The registration document must be submitted on a form prepared by the department and must include the following information:(1) The name and mailing address of the applicant.(2) The name, if any, and location of the water source.(3) The type of water source.(4) The point in the water source from which the user proposes to withdraw the water.(5) The name, location and acreage of the lands or other application for which the water is to be withdrawn.(6) The location and description of the water well, canal, tunnel or piping and other works or equipment through which the water is to be withdrawn.(7) The amount, in gallons, of water withdrawn on an average day of operation during the preceding year and the number of days during the preceding year when water was withdrawn.(8) The total amount, in gallons, of water estimated to be withdrawn and the periods of time when the withdrawal is scheduled during the current year.(9) The location, means and expected condition of any returned water.(c) Data center reporting.--A data center that is subject to the reporting requirements under section 201 shall meet the registration requirements established under this section by submitting a copy of the annual report provided under section 201 to the department.20260HB2682PN3737 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Critical water planning areas.--(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), the department may not issue a new registration under this section to any tier 2 extraordinary water user that is proposing to locate in a critical water planning area.(2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply to tier 2 extraordinary water users that demonstrate to the department through a water quality assessment, on a form and in a manner determined by the department, that the proposed withdrawal in a critical water planning area will not cause unreasonable degradation of the watershed consistent with the Commonwealth's obligations under section 27 of Article I of the Constitution of Pennsylvania.Section 302. Water resource fee.(a) Fee.--An extraordinary water user shall pay to the Commonwealth the following fees:(1) Except as provided in paragraph (4), for water withdrawn and subsequently returned to the water source, a water resource fee of $0.0001 per gallon for water withdrawals greater than 10,000 gallons per day for nonmunicipal purposes.(2) Except as provided in paragraph (4), for water withdrawn and consumed, a water resource fee of $0.001 per gallon for water consumption greater than 10,000 gallons per day but less than 1,000,000 gallons per day for nonmunicipal purposes.(3) Except as provided in paragraph (4), for water withdrawn and consumed, a water resource fee of $0.002 per gallon for water consumption by a tier 2 extraordinary water user for nonmunicipal purposes. Any tier 2 extraordinary 20260HB2682PN3737 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 water user that does not meet the water usage effectiveness requirements established by the department under section 305 within three years of the initial operation of the user shall pay an additional surcharge of $0.001 per gallon of consumed water. The proceeds of this surcharge shall be deposited by the department into the Critical Water Planning Area Administration and Watershed Monitoring Fund.(4) If the extraordinary water user is an electric utility generator that withdraws or consumes water, a fee of $1.00 per megawatt hour of electricity generated and sold.(b) Water consumption calculation.--(1) For purposes of calculating the fee under subsection (a)(2) or (3), if the extraordinary water user:(i) measures water use by meter, the difference between the values of daily withdrawn water and daily returned water shall be reported as the amount consumed; or(ii) does not measure metered, withdrawn and returned water or, due to evaporation or method of use, finds it impossible to accurately measure water consumed, the amount consumed shall be based on the department's consumptive use coefficients.(2) The department shall determine which extraordinary water users are subject to paragraph (1)(ii) and shall develop coefficients for those extraordinary water users.(c) Coordination with other fees.--The fees, if any, paid by an extraordinary water user under the act of July 7, 1961 (P.L.518, No.268), known as the Delaware River Basin Compact, and the act of July 17, 1968 (P.L.368, No.181), referred to as the Susquehanna River Basin Compact Law, to the Delaware River 20260HB2682PN3737 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Basin Commission or the Susquehanna River Basin Commission shall be subtracted from fees owed under this section.(d) Data center reporting.--For a data center subject to the reporting requirements under section 201, the water consumption calculations used to determine fee payments under this section shall be determined using the water consumption data included in the data center's report submitted under section 201.(e) Method of reporting.--The water consumption and return levels for any extraordinary water user required to pay a water resource fee under this section but that is not required to submit a report under section 201 shall be calculated through the registration and reporting requirements established under 27 Pa.C.S. § 3118 (relating to water use registration and reporting).(f) Rates.--The fee rates established under this section shall be set by the General Assembly and may be adjusted by the Environmental Quality Board by regulation solely to account for changes in the Consumer Price Index. The Environmental Quality Board may not modify fee thresholds, the distinction between returned and consumed water or the allocation structure established under section 303 by regulation.Section 303. Distribution of water resource fees.(a) Establishment of Water Use Fund.--The Water Use Fund is established in the State Treasury. The money of the fund is appropriated on a continuing basis to the departments, in the amounts and for the purposes specified in subsection (b).(b) Funding source and distribution.--The fees collected under section 302 shall be paid into the fund. The money of the fund shall be used annually as follows:(1) The amount necessary to satisfy Pennsylvania's 20260HB2682PN3737 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 annual assessment obligations to the Delaware River Basin Commission under the act of July 7, 1961 (P.L.518, No.268), known as the Delaware River Basin Compact, and to the Susquehanna River Basin Commission under the act of July 17, 1968 (P.L.368, No.181), referred to as the Susquehanna River Basin Compact Law, shall be paid from the fund annually prior to any other distribution under this subsection. Payment shall be made within 60 days of each commission's adoption of its current annual expense budget. The amounts required under this paragraph shall be determined by the respective commission's approved budget apportionment and shall not require additional legislative action.(2) The amount of $30,000,000 to the department for water-related programs and activities, to be distributed to the department as follows:(i) No less than 17% of the amount distributed under this paragraph shall be directed to the Low-Income Water Customer Assistance Program accounts of community water systems serving territories in which extraordinary water users are registered, if any accounts have been established, distributed proportionally by the number of registered users in each service territory.(ii) After distribution under subparagraph (i), the remaining balance of the total amount shall be distributed for general government operations.(3) The amount of $25,000,000 to the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources for water-related programs and activities with any balance of that amount for general government operations.(4) The amount of $11,000,000 to the Department of 20260HB2682PN3737 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Agriculture for water-related programs and activities with any balance of that amount for general government operations.(5) The amount of $5,000,000 to the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission for water-related programs and activities with any balance of that amount for general government operations.(6) The amount of $15,000,000 to the Critical Water Planning Area Administration and Watershed Monitoring Fund.(7) The amount of $10,000,000 to the Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission, which shall establish and administer a Water Ratepayer Relief Program. The program shall provide credits or rebates to residential water customers in municipalities where one or more tier 2 extraordinary water users are registered under section 301. The commission shall promulgate regulations establishing eligibility criteria, credit amounts and distribution mechanisms for the program, with priority given to low-income households. Credits shall be applied directly to customer water bills if administratively feasible.(8) The balance of money in the fund to PENNVEST, which shall distribute the remainder under section 505 or use the balance to service the debt for any bonds issued under Chapter 5.(9) If the total fees collected under section 302 in a fiscal year are insufficient to fund the full amounts specified in paragraphs (2), (3), (4), (5), (6) and (7) after satisfying the obligations under paragraph (1), the available balance shall be distributed proportionally among the recipients in paragraphs (2), (3), (4), (5), (6) and (7) based on each recipient's share of the total amount specified 20260HB2682PN3737 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in the paragraphs. A recipient under paragraphs (2), (3), (4), (5), (6) and (7) may not receive a distribution that exceeds the recipient's specified amount in a year in which collections exceed the aggregate of the amounts. Excess collections above the aggregate of paragraphs (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6) and (7) shall be transferred to PENNVEST under paragraph (8).Section 304. Critical Water Planning Area Administration and Watershed Monitoring Fund.The Critical Water Planning Area Administration and Watershed Monitoring Fund is established in the State Treasury.Section 305. Duties of department.The department shall exercise powers granted to it by this act and shall perform the duties imposed upon it by this act, which shall include the following:(1) Using money in the Critical Water Planning Area Administration and Watershed Monitoring Fund for the following purposes:(i) Completing the critical water planning area designation process required under 27 Pa.C.S. § 3112 (relating to plan contents).(ii) Developing critical area resource plans for designated critical water planning areas.(iii) Installing and maintaining department watershed monitoring stations in designated critical water planning areas and surrounding areas.(iv) Funding department staff responsible for critical water planning area administration.(2) Promulgating regulations to establish:(i) Benchmarks for water usage effectiveness for 20260HB2682PN3737 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 tier 2 extraordinary water users.(ii) Criteria and information that must be provided in a water quality assessment by a tier 2 extraordinary water user under section 301(d)(2). The department shall make available on its publicly accessible Internet website any form necessary to complete the water quality assessment.(iii) The manner and form through which a data center may appeal the department's decision regarding what information qualifies as proprietary information under section 201(e)(1)(i).(3) Publishing and annually updating the following information on the department's publicly accessible Internet website:(i) The identity of each registered extraordinary water user.(ii) Each extraordinary water user's reported withdrawal and consumption volume for each watershed.(iii) The fees paid by each registered user under section 302.(iv) Distributions made from the Critical Water Planning Area Administration and Watershed Monitoring Fund to each watershed under section 505 in the year preceding each publication and update of the information.Section 306. Preconstruction notification.In addition to any other requirements under Federal or State law, a person who is developing a facility that is expected to withdraw over 500,000 gallons of water per day shall notify the department, the applicable river basin commission and any municipality that would be affected by the facility of the 20260HB2682PN3737 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 planned construction and operation of the facility in a form and manner prescribed by the department at least 180 days before the facility begins withdrawals.CHAPTER 5WATERSHED PROTECTION BONDSSection 501. Authorization to incur indebtedness.Under the provisions of section 7(a)(3) of Article VIII of the Constitution of Pennsylvania, PENNVEST may submit the question of a bond issuance in the amount of up to $5,000,000,000 for the protection of watersheds, water resources, water environments, fresh water sources, the furthering of water conservation and other water-related environmental initiatives to the electors at the next election in the year that PENNVEST decides to issue bonds.Section 502. Certification.The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall certify the question under section 501 to the county board of elections.Section 503. Question to electorate.The question under section 501 shall be in the following form:Do you favor authorizing the Commonwealth to incur an indebtedness of up to $ , to be repaid using funds generated under the act of (P.L. , No. ), known as the Pennsylvania Water Resource Act, for the issuance of bonds for the maintenance and protection of watersheds, water resources, the furthering of water conservation and other water-related environmental initiatives?Section 504. Referendum procedure.The referendum shall be conducted in accordance with the act 20260HB2682PN3737 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, except that:(1) the requirements for advertising or notice related to the question are waived;(2) the requirements for a statement under section 201.1 of the Pennsylvania Election Code are waived; and(3) the authority of the Secretary of the Commonwealth to determine the form of the question is abrogated.Section 505. Use of proceeds.A bond issued under this chapter must be used and paid for proportionally to the proceeds generated by the fees collected from water users. Proceeds of borrowing authorized under this chapter shall be used only for the following purposes and shall be allocated to watersheds based on the percentage of fees generated under section 302 in each watershed respectively:(1) The maintenance and protection of:(i) Watersheds.(ii) Water resources.(iii) Water environments.(iv) Freshwater sources.(2) The furthering of water conservation.(3) Completion of critical water planning area designations and critical area resource plan development.(4) Installation of groundwater monitoring infrastructure in areas of projected high data center concentration.(5) Grants and loans to municipalities and water authorities for infrastructure upgrades required to serve large industrial water users, conditioned on cost recovery from the users.20260HB2682PN3737 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) Watershed restoration in areas where documented consumptive use has measurably reduced water availability.CHAPTER 7MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSection 701. Regulations.The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations as needed to administer and enforce this act.Section 702. Notice and report.(a) Publication.--The Secretary of Environmental Protection shall, no later than 24 months after the effective date of this subsection, transmit notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin that the department has completed the critical water planning area designation process provided under 27 Pa.C.S. § 3112 (relating to plan contents).(b) Report.--No later than 12 months after the effective date of this subsection, the Secretary of Environmental Protection shall submit to the chair and minority chair of the Environmental Resources and Energy Committee of the Senate and the chair and minority chair of the Environmental and Natural Resource Protection Committee of the House of Representatives a report detailing the progress made by the department in the critical water planning area designation process provided under 27 Pa.C.S. § 3112 during the preceding 12 months.Section 703. Effective date.This act shall take effect as follows:(1) Section 301(d) shall take effect upon publication of the notice under section 702.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2682PN3737 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930